Hawaii statutes.
§482-36 Fees. The application fee to
register a mark shall be $50 for each class of goods or services. A special
handling fee of $20 for expediting the registration of a mark shall be assessed
by the director for each class of goods or services. All special handling fees
shall be credited to the compliance resolution fund established under section
26-9(o). Unless otherwise specified by the director, these fees shall not be
refundable. [L 2001, c 15, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §99]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next